Nebraska, session 109, LB529.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 73-803, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
73-803 For purposes of the State Procurement Act:
(1) Contract includes any contract for services and contract for personal
property;
(2) Contract for personal property means any contract entered into by the
state with another party for a stated consideration, which provides that the
state agency is to receive the personal property or use of such personal
property furnished by the other party. Contract for personal property includes
leases;
(3) Contract for services means any contract that directly engages the
time or effort of an independent contractor whose purpose is to perform an
identifiable task, study, or report rather than to furnish an end item of
supply, goods, equipment, or material;
(4) Cooperative agreement means a legal instrument reflecting a
relationship between the State of Nebraska and any other entity where (a) the
principal purpose of the relationship is to transfer a thing of value to the
entity to carry out a public purpose of support or stimulation by law instead
of acquiring property or services for the direct benefit of the State of
Nebraska and (b) substantial involvement is expected between the State of
Nebraska and the entity when carrying out the activity contemplated in the
agreement;
(5) Division means the materiel division of the Department of
Administrative Services;
(6) Emergency means necessary to meet an urgent or unexpected requirement
or when health and public safety or the conservation of public resources is at
risk;
(7) Grant agreement means a legal instrument reflecting a relationship
between the State of Nebraska and any other entity where (a) the principal
purpose of the relationship is to transfer a thing of value to the entity to
carry out a public purpose of support or stimulation by law instead of
acquiring property or services for the direct benefit of the State of Nebraska
and (b) substantial involvement is not expected between the State of Nebraska
and the entity when carrying out the activity contemplated in the agreement;
(8) Occasional means seasonal, irregular, or fluctuating in nature;
(9) Personal property includes all materials, supplies, furniture,
equipment, printing, stationery, automotive and road equipment, and other
chattels, goods, wares, and merchandise;
(10) Sole source means of such a unique nature that the contractor
selected is clearly and justifiably the only practicable source to provide the
service or personal property. Determination that the contractor selected is
justifiably the sole source is based on either the uniqueness of the service or
personal property or sole availability at the location required;
(11) State agency means any agency, board, or commission of this state,
except for the University of Nebraska or the Nebraska state colleges. For
purposes of procurement of services, state agency does not include the
University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, the Nebraska Investment
Council, the courts, the Legislature, or any officer or state agency
established by the Constitution of Nebraska. Changes made to this subdivision
by this legislative bill shall be construed to apply to any action taken on or
after July 19, 2024; and
(12) Temporary means a finite period of time with respect to a specific
task or result relating to a contract for services.
Sec. 2. Original section 73-803, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-